Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
In General

§ 43-33-1.
Title; definitions.

Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-53 may be referred to as the “Housing Authorities Law,” and the following terms, whenever used or referred to in said sections, shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Authority” or “housing authority” shall mean any of the public corporations created by or pursuant to this Housing Authorities Law, or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto, with power to undertake housing projects for the persons of low income.

“City” shall mean any city in this state. “County” shall mean any county in this state. “The city” shall mean the particular city for which a particular housing authority is created. “The county” shall mean the particular county for which a particular housing authority is created.

“State public body” shall mean any city, town, village, county, municipal corporation, commission, district, authority, or other subdivision or other public body of this state.

“Governing body” shall mean, in the case of a city, the board of aldermen, commissioners, or council; in the case of a county, the board of supervisors; and in the case of any other state public body, the board of aldermen, council, commissioners, board or other body having charge of the fiscal affairs of such state public body.

“Mayor” shall mean the mayor of the city or the officer thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the mayor or executive head of the city.

“Clerk” shall mean the clerk of the city or the clerk of the county, as the case may be, or the officer charged with the duties customarily imposed on such clerk.

“Area of operation,” in the case of a housing authority of a city, shall include such city and the area within five (5) miles of the territorial boundaries thereof.

“Federal government” shall include the United States of America, the United States Housing Authority, or any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Slum” shall mean any area where dwellings predominate which, by reason of dilapidation, overcrowding, faulty arrangement, or design, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or any combination of these factors, are detrimental to safety, health or morals.

“Housing project” shall mean any work or undertaking: (1) to demolish, clear or remove buildings from any slum area; such work or undertaking may embrace the adoption of such area to public purposes, including parks or other recreational or community purposes; or (2) to provide decent, safe and sanitary urban or rural dwellings, apartments, or other living accommodations for persons of low income; such work or undertaking may include buildings, land, equipment, facilities, and other real or personal property for necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances, streets, sewers, water service, parks, site preparation, gardening, administrative, community, health, recreational, welfare or other purposes; or (3) to accomplish a combination of the aforegoing. The term “housing project” also may be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration and repair of the improvements and all other work in connection therewith.

“Persons of low income” shall mean persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary (as determined by the authority undertaking the housing project) to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding.

“Bonds” shall mean any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued by a housing authority.

“Real property” shall include all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise and the indebtedness secured by such liens.

“Obligee of the authority” or “obligee” shall include any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, or lessor demising to the authority property used in connection with a housing project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7295; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 1.

§ 43-33-3.
Finding and declaration of necessity.

It is hereby declared (a) that the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired and are governmental functions of state concern and (b) that it is in the public interest that work on projects for such purposes be commenced as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency; and the necessity in the public interest for the provisions hereinafter enacted, is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7296; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 2.

§ 43-33-5.
Housing authorities created.

In each town or city and in each county of the state there is hereby created a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “housing authority” of the town or city or county. However, such authority shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder until or unless the governing body of the town or city or the county, as the case may be, by proper resolution shall declare at any time hereafter that there is need for an authority to function in such town or city or county. The determination as to whether there is such need for an authority to function (a) may be made by the governing body on its own motion or (b) shall be made by the governing body upon the filing of a petition signed by twenty-five (25) residents of the town or city or county, as the case may be, asserting that there is need for an authority to function in such town or city or county and requesting that the governing body so declare.

The governing body shall adopt a resolution declaring that there is need for a housing authority in the town or city or county, as the case may be, if it shall find (a) that unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such town or city or county or (b) that there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such town or city or county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford. In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or unsanitary said governing body may take into consideration the degree of overcrowding, the percentage of land coverage, the light, air, space and access available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations, the size and arrangement of the rooms, the sanitary facilities, and the extent to which conditions exist in such buildings which endanger life or property by fire or other causes.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers hereunder upon proof of the adoption of a resolution by the governing body declaring the need for the authority. Such resolution or resolutions shall be deemed sufficient if it declares that there is such need for an authority and finds in substantially the foregoing terms (no further detail being necessary) that either or both of the above enumerated conditions exist in the town or city or county, as the case may be. A copy of such resolution duly certified by the clerk shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action or proceeding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7297; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 511.

§ 43-33-7.
Appointment, qualifications and tenure of commissioners.

When the governing body of a city adopts a resolution as provided in Section 43-33-5, such governing body shall forthwith appoint five (5) persons as commissioners of the authority created for said city.When the governing body of a county adopts a resolution as provided in Section 43-33-5, said governing body shall appoint five (5) commissioners for said board created for said county.The commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively, from the date of their appointment, and thereafter when a vacancy shall occur either by the expiration of term of office or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled by the governing body of the city or county, as the case may be, either to fill an unexpired term where a commissioner shall die or resign or shall become disqualified during his term, or for a full term of five (5) years where the term of a commissioner expires.No commissioner of an authority may be an officer or employee of the city or county for which the authority is created.However, at least one (1) commissioner must be a person who is directly assisted by the authority if required under applicable federal law.A commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified.A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the city or county as the case may be and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.A commissioner shall receive compensation for his services in the manner and amount authorized in Section 25-3-69 for up to fifteen (15) days during the fiscal year of the authority, and he shall also be entitled to necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties.

The powers of each authority shall be vested in the commissioners thereof in office from time to time. Three (3) commissioners shall constitute a quorum of the authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws of the authority shall require a larger number. The board of commissioners shall elect which member shall be chairman and thereafter fill any vacancy by like election. An authority shall select from among its commissioners a vice chairman, and it may employ a secretary (who shall be executive director), technical experts and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. For such legal services as it may require, an authority may call upon the chief law officer of the city or the county or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper.

In the event that a directly assisted commissioner ceases to be directly assisted by the authority for which he/she serves as commissioner, said person shall then become disqualified to serve that authority as a directly assisted commissioner and shall be replaced as commissioner by a person who is directly assisted by the authority if federal law then requires that authority to have a directly assisted commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7298; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 4; Laws, 1946, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2002.).

§ 43-33-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 7299; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 5; Laws, 1952, ch. 369, § 1]

§ 43-33-11.
Powers of authority.

An authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic, exercising public and essential governmental functions, and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

To sue and to be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; and to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this article, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority.

Within its area of operation: to prepare, carry out, acquire, lease and operate housing projects; to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration or repair of any housing project or any part thereof.

To arrange or contract for the furnishing by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works or facilities for, or in connection with, a housing project or the occupants thereof; and (notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this article or in any other provision of law) to include in any contract let in connection with a project, stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the project.

To lease or rent any dwellings, houses, accommodations, lands, buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any housing project and (subject to the limitations contained in this article) to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor; to own, hold and improve real or personal property; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise or otherwise any real or personal property or any interest therein; to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property; to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest therein; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the authority against any risks or hazards; to procure or agree to the procurement of insurance or guarantees from the federal government of the payment of any bonds or parts thereof issued by an authority, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance.

To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to purchase its bonds at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, all bonds so purchased to be canceled.

Within its area of operation: to investigate into living, dwelling and housing conditions and into the means and methods of improving such conditions; to determine where slum areas exist or where there is a shortage of decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income; to make studies and recommendations relating to the problem of clearing, replanning and reconstructing of slum areas, and the problem of providing dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and to cooperate with the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof in action taken in connection with such problems; and to engage in research, studies and experimentation on the subject of housing.

Acting through one or more commissioners or other person or persons designated by the authority: to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material to its information; to administer oaths, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are outside of the state or unable to attend before the authority, or excused from attendance; to make available to appropriate agencies (including those charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions, or of demolishing unsafe or unsanitary structures within its area of operation) its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety or welfare.

To make payments to public bodies in the state in such amounts as it finds desirable, notwithstanding any statutory limitation on the amount of such payments.

To establish and operate a nonprofit corporation for housing and community development purposes.

To exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein granted.

No provisions of law with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the Legislature shall specifically so state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7300, 7344-03; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 6; Laws, 1944, ch. 217, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 490, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-33-13.
Operation not for profit.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state that each housing authority shall manage and operate its housing projects in an efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals for dwelling accommodations at the lowest possible rates consistent with its providing decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations, and that no housing authority shall construct or operate any such project for profit, or as a source of revenue to the city or the county. To this end an authority shall fix the rentals for dwellings in its projects at no higher rates than it shall find to be necessary in order to produce revenues which (together with all other available moneys, revenues, income and receipts of the authority from whatever sources derived) will be sufficient (a) to pay, as the same become due, the principal and interest on the bonds of the authority; (b) to meet the cost of, and to provide for, maintaining and operating the projects (including the cost of any insurance) and the administrative expenses of the authority; and (c) to create (during not less than six (6) years immediately succeeding its issuance of any bonds) a reserve sufficient to meet the largest principal and interest payments which will be due on such bonds in any one year thereafter and to maintain such reserve.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7301; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 7.

§ 43-33-15.
Rentals and tenant selection.

In the operation or management of housing projects an authority shall at all times observe the following duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection:

It may rent or lease the dwelling accommodations therein only to persons of low income and at rentals within the financial reach of such persons of low income;

It may rent or lease to a tenant dwelling accommodations consisting of the number of rooms (but no greater number) which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof, without overcrowding;

The dwellings in low-rent housing as defined in this article shall be available solely for families whose net annual income at the time of admission, less an exemption of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each minor member of the family other than the head of the family and his spouse, does not exceed five (5) times the annual rental (including the value or cost to them of water, electricity, gas, other heating and cooking fuels, and other utilities) of the dwellings to be furnished such families. For the purpose of determining eligibility for continued occupancy, a public housing agency shall allow, from the net income of any family, an exemption for each minor member of the family (other than the head of the family and his spouse) of either (a) one hundred dollars ($100.00), or (b) all or any part of the annual income of such minor. For the purpose of this subparagraph, a minor shall mean a person less than twenty-one (21) years of age.

Nothing contained in this section or Section 43-33-13 shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority to vest in an obligee the right, in the event of a default by the authority, to take possession of a housing project or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof, free from all the restrictions imposed by this section or Section 43-33-13.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7302; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 8; Laws, 1950, ch. 513.

§ 43-33-16.
Prohibition against use of fraudulent means to obtain public housing.

Any person who obtains or attempts to obtain, or who establishes or attempts to establish, eligibility for, and any person who knowingly or intentionally aids or abets such person in obtaining or attempting to obtain, or in establishing or attempting to establish eligibility for, any public housing, or a reduction in public housing rental charges, or any rent subsidy, to which such person would not otherwise be entitled, by means of a false statement, failure to disclose information, impersonation, or other fraudulent scheme or device shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as for a misdemeanor. As used in this section “public housing” shall mean housing which is constructed, operated or maintained by the state, a county, a municipal corporation, a housing authority, or by any other political subdivision or public corporation of the state or its subdivisions.

Notice of this section shall be printed on the application forms for public housing in the state, and it shall be displayed in the office where such application is made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 384, §§ 1-2, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-33-17.
Cooperation of authorities.

Any two (2) or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise, either jointly or otherwise, of any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing (including the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations and giving security therefor), planning, undertaking, owning, constructing, operating or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects located within the area of operation of any one (1) or more of said authorities. For such purpose an authority may by resolution prescribe and authorize any other housing authority or authorities, so joining or cooperating with it, to act on its behalf with respect to any or all of such powers. Any authorities joining or cooperating with one another may by resolutions appoint from among the commissioners of such authorities an executive committee with full power to act on behalf of such authorities with respect to any or all of their powers, as prescribed by resolutions of such authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7303; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 9; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 2.

§ 43-33-19.
Eminent domain.

An authority shall have the right to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property which it may deem necessary for its purposes under this article after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein is necessary for such purposes. An authority may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided in Chapter 27, Title 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972; or it may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired in like manner; no real property belonging to the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof may be acquired without its consent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7304; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 10.

§ 43-33-21.
Planning, zoning and building laws.

All housing projects of an authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary and building laws, ordinances and regulations applicable to the locality in which the housing project is situated. In the planning and location of any housing project, an authority shall take into consideration the relationship of the project to any larger plan or long-range program for the development of the area in which the housing authority functions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7305; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 11.

§ 43-33-23.
Bonds.

An authority shall have power to issue bonds from time to time, in its discretion, for any of its corporate purposes. An authority shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued by it. An authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) bonds on which the principal and interest are payable: (a) exclusively from the income and revenues of the housing project financed with the proceeds of such bonds; (b) exclusively from the income and revenues of certain designated housing projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; or (c) from its revenues generally. Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant or contributions from the federal government or other source, or a pledge of any income or revenues of the authority, or a mortgage of any housing project, projects or other property of the authority.

Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of an authority (and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face) shall not be a debt of the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof and neither the city or the county, nor the state or any political subdivision thereof shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of said authority. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Bonds of an authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be public instrumentalities and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7306; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 12.

§ 43-33-25.
Form and sale of bonds.

Bonds of an authority shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, not to exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution, its trust indenture or mortgage may provide. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issued. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). The denomination, form, and place, or places, of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or ordinance of the governing authorities issuing such bonds. Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the chairman and secretary of such authority, with the seal of the authority impressed, imprinted or reproduced thereon. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such chairman and secretary. No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of this article for less than par and accrued interest.

The bonds may be sold at not less than par at public sale held after notice published once at least five (5) days prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation and in a financial newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, or in the City of New York, New York. Such bonds may be sold at not less than par to the federal government or to a federally chartered corporation at private sale without any public advertisement.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action or proceedings, involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of an authority or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority to aid in financing a housing project to provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for a housing project of such character, and said project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and constructed in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7307; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 13; Laws, 1970, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 358, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 22; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 27; Laws, 2005, ch. 308, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 43-33-27.
Provisions of bonds, trust indentures, and mortgages.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, an authority, in addition to its other powers, shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees or revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence.

To mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property, then owned or thereafter acquired.

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues, or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal property, to which its right or title then exists or may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or property; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any housing project or any part thereof; and to covenant as to what other, or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it.

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon; and to redeem the bonds, and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant (subject to the limitations contained in this article) as to the rents and fees to be charged in the operation of a housing project or projects, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to create or to authorize the creation of special funds for moneys held for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in such funds.

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given.

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its real or personal property; and to covenant as to the maintenance of its real and personal property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation; and to covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

To vest in a trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in a trustee or trustees the right, in the event of a default by said authority, to take possession and use, operate and manage any housing project or part thereof, and to collect the rents and revenues arising therefrom and to dispose of such moneys in accordance with the agreement of the authority with said trustees; to provide for the powers and duties of a trustee or trustees and to limit the liabilities thereof; and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any portion of them may enforce any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds.

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers herein granted; to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character; to make such covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of said authority, as will tend to make the bonds more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7308; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 14.